Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 8. Sustainable Energy Transmission and Supply.

Sec. 44.88.650.
Sustainable energy transmission and supply development program.

The sustainable energy transmission and supply development program is created in the authority to promote and provide financing for qualified energy development in the state to alleviate unemployment and contribute to the state’s economic welfare, economic diversity, and economic development.

History.

(§ 12 ch 60 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.88.700

; renumbered in 2012.

Sec. 44.88.660.
Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund.

The Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund is established in the authority. The development fund consists of appropriations made to the development fund by the legislature, money or other assets transferred to the development fund by a vote of the members of the authority under AS

44.88.050

from any other fund controlled by the authority, and unrestricted loan repayments, interest, or other income earned on loans, investments, or assets of the development fund. The development fund is not an account in the revolving fund established in AS

44.88.060

, and the authority shall account for the development fund separately from the revolving fund. The authority may create additional accounts in the development fund. Subject to agreements made with the holders of the authority’s bonds or with other persons, the authority may transfer amounts in an account in the development fund to another account in the development fund. Amounts deposited in the development fund may be pledged to the payment of bonds of the authority or expended for the purposes of AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

. The authority has the powers and responsibilities established in AS

37.10.071

with respect to the investment of amounts held in the development fund.

History.

(§ 12 ch 60 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2014)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.88.710

and renumbered in 2012, at which time “AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

” was substituted for “AS

44.88.700

—

44.88.740

” to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Cross references. —

For a provision authorizing financing of a liquefied natural gas production plant on the North Slope and distribution system in Interior Alaska, see sec. 11,
ch. 26, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provisions amending sec. 11, ch. 26, SLA 2013 relating to an Interior natural gas project and providing legislative intent, see secs. 1 and 9 — 10, ch. 39, SLA 2015.

For provision amending sec. 11(f), ch. 26, SLA 2013, to extend bonding authority from July 1, 2018, to July 1, 2023, see sec. 12, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 14, 2014, substituted “the development fund by a vote of the members of the authority under AS

44.88.050

from any other fund controlled by the authority,” for “the development fund by the authority”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning ch. 26, SLA 2013 (SB 23), authorizing financing of a liquefied natural gas production plant on the North Slope and distribution system in Interior Alaska, see 2013 Senate Journal 40 — 42.

Sec. 44.88.670.
Use of fund balance.

Subject to the requirements of AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

, the authority may use money in the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS

44.88.660

) to assist in the construction, improvement, rehabilitation, and expansion of qualified energy development.

History.

(§ 12 ch 60 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.88.720

; renumbered in 2012, at which time “AS

44.88.660

” was substituted for “AS

44.88.710

” and “AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

” was substituted for “AS

44.88.710

—

44.88.740

” to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 44.88.680.
Qualified energy development; powers and duties of the authority.

Subject to the limitations of AS

44.88.690

, for qualified energy development, the authority may

use the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS

44.88.660

) to finance qualified energy development, insure project obligations, guarantee loans or bonds, and establish reserves;

acquire real or personal property by purchase, transfer, or foreclosure when the acquisition is necessary to protect the authority’s interest in financing;

defer principal payments or capitalize interest on qualified energy development financing;

subject to AS

36.30.085(e)

, enter into lease agreements, sales-lease-back agreements, build-operate-transfer and operate-transfer agreements, or any similar project financing agreement for a qualified energy development;

enter into agreements with government entities for the transfer and control of infrastructure, facilities, rights-of-way, and studies;

contract for services with a professional advisor, including an attorney, bond counsel, engineer, or other technical expert necessary to fulfill the purposes of the program;

subject to AS

44.88.090

, borrow money and issue bonds; and

pay off the principal of and interest on bonds issued by a municipality to acquire, construct, improve, or equip a public utility if the municipality continues to pay the authority the bond payments due under the terms of the bonds; the authority shall retain the payments from the municipality in a sinking fund, and the municipality may apply to use the funds for qualified energy development.

The authority shall adopt regulations to implement AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

, including

an application process for acquiring financing under this section;

qualifications for qualified energy development projects applying for financing under this section; and

fiscal controls and accounting procedures for the development fund.

History.

(§ 12 ch 60 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.88.730

; renumbered in 2012, at which time “AS

44.88.660

” was substituted for “AS

44.88.710

” in (a) and “AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

” was substituted for “AS

44.88.700

—

44.88.740

” in (a) and (b) to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 44.88.690.
Limitations on financing; use as security.

Unless the authority has obtained legislative approval by law, the authority may not use the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund established in AS

44.88.660

to

make a loan for more than one-third of the capital cost of qualified energy development;

make a loan guarantee if the amount of the guarantee exceeds $20,000,000; or

purchase or acquire gas reserves or a gas lease or become a working interest owner of a natural gas lease.

Financing under AS

44.88.680

is limited to the life of qualified energy development, which may not be more than

30 years; or

50 years for a transmission line or hydroelectric qualified energy development.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the authority may use the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund established in AS

44.88.660

as security for a bond guarantee.

History.

(§ 12 ch 60 SLA 2012; am §§ 2, 3 ch 20 SLA 2014; am § 7 ch 39 SLA 2015)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.88.740

; renumbered in 2012, at which time “AS

44.88.680

” was substituted for “AS

44.88.730

” to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Cross references. —

For provision granting legislative approval to exceed the limitations of this section in providing financing for a liquefied natural gas production plant on the North Slope and distribution system in Interior Alaska, see sec. 11,
ch. 26, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provisions amending sec. 11, ch. 26, SLA 2013 relating to an Interior natural gas project and providing legislative intent, see secs. 1 and 9 — 10, ch. 39, SLA 2015.

For provision amending sec. 11(f), ch. 26, SLA 2013, to extend bonding authority from July 1, 2018, to July 1, 2023, see sec. 12, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 14, 2014, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “use the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund established in AS

44.88.660

to make” for “finance or participate in financing of”, added “a loan for” at the beginning of (a)(1), in (a)(2), substituted “if the amount of the guarantee exceeds” for “that exceeds”; added (c).

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), added (a)(3) and made stylistic and related changes.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning ch. 39, SLA 2015 (HB 105), see 2015 House Journal 188 - 192.